North Dakota, session 69, HB1532.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY - TEMPORARY
LEGISLATIVE ASSISTANTS. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in
the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $3,300,000, or so much of the sum as
may be necessary, to the legislative assembly for the purpose defraying the expenses of each
legislator hiring a temporary legislative assistant during legislative sessions, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2. OFFICE OF MANAGEMENT AND BUDGET OFFICE SPACE ANALYSIS -
REPORT TO LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT. The director of the office of management and
budget shall perform an analysis of office space in the capitol. The director shall determine
which state agencies in the capitol and the judicial wing of the capitol occupy excess space due
to the movement over the last five years toward hybrid and remote work arrangements. The
director shall prepare recommendations for the consolidation of executive branch agency office
space and provide hoteling options to reduce the office space needs of agencies and for the
reduction of the amount of space used for meeting rooms and conference rooms that could be
consolidated. The director also shall provide recommendations for the location of workspace for
temporary legislative assistants authorized under section 1 of this Act. The director shall provide
the recommendations to the legislative management by August 15, 2026.
Page No. 1 25.1143.01000